Florida, session 2026, SB1482.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSection 186.801, Florida Statutes, is amended to 30 read: 31 186.801âTen-year site plans.â 32 (1)âEach electric utility shall submit to the Public 33 Service Commission a 10-year site plan that estimates which 34 shall estimate its anticipated demand, its power-generating 35 needs, the impact of planned demand-side management measures on 36 such generating needs, and the general location of its proposed 37 power plant sites. 38 (2)âThe 10-year plan must shall be reviewed and submitted 39 not less frequently than every 2 years. 40 (3)(2)âWithin 9 months after the receipt of the proposed 41 plan, the commission shall issue a final order approving, 42 approving with amendments, or rejecting such make a preliminary 43 study of such plan and classify it as âsuitableâ or 44 âunsuitable.â The commission may suggest alternatives to the 45 plan. 46 (a)âThe commission may reject such plan if the plan does 47 not comply with this section and commission rules. 48 (b)âFollowing any final order rejecting a plan, an electric 49 utility shall submit a revised plan for approval within 60 days 50 after such order. 51 (c)âThe commission shall adopt procedures for consideration 52 and approval of each electric utilityâs plans consistent with 53 chapter 120. The commission shall hold a public hearing for a 54 plan submitted by a public utility as defined in s. 366.02 and 55 may hold a hearing upon the filing of a petition or request for 56 hearing for a plan submitted by an electric utility. 57 Notwithstanding chapter 120 or any other law, the commission 58 must grant a petition or request to intervene if participation 59 by the party submitting such petition or request is in the 60 public interest and will not unduly impair the efficiency or 61 administration of the proceeding. 62 (4)âAll findings of the commission must shall be made 63 available to the Department of Environmental Protection for its 64 consideration at any subsequent electrical power plant site 65 certification proceedings. 66 (5)âIt is recognized that 10-year site plans submitted by 67 an electric utility are tentative information for planning 68 purposes only and may be amended and submitted for approval at 69 any time at the discretion of the utility upon written 70 notification to the commission. An electric utility may not file 71 an A complete application for certification of an electrical 72 power plant site under chapter 403, when such site is not 73 designated in the current 10-year site plan of the applicant, 74 shall constitute an amendment to the 10-year site plan. 75 (6)âBefore issuing its final order, the commission shall 76 review such plan to determine whether it is reasonable and in 77 the best interest of the utilityâs customers in this state. In 78 its review preliminary study of such each 10-year site plan, the 79 commission shall consider such plan as a planning document and 80 shall review: 81 (a)âThe need, including the need as determined by the 82 commission, for electrical power in the area to be served. 83 (b)âThe adequacy and cost-effectiveness of planned 84 generation, transmission, and distribution resources relative to 85 other available options. 86 (c)âThe benefits of energy resources sited within this 87 state which reduce the stateâs reliance on energy and fuels 88 imported from outside this state. 89 (d)âThe impact of the plan on future regulatory risks and 90 compliance costs and the impacts of those risks and costs on the 91 utilityâs customers. 92 (e)âThe adequacy of total demand-side management measures 93 proposed by the utility to mitigate its need for new generation. 94 (f)(b)âThe effect on fuel diversity within this the state. 95 (g)(c)âThe anticipated environmental impact of each 96 proposed electrical power plant site. 97 (h)(d)âPossible alternatives to the proposed plan, 98 including alternative technologies for proposed resources. 99 (i)(e)âThe views of appropriate local, state, and federal 100 agencies, including the views of the appropriate water 101 management district as to the availability of water and its 102 recommendation as to the use by the proposed plant of salt water 103 or fresh water for cooling purposes. 104 (j)(f)âThe extent to which the plan is consistent with the 105 state comprehensive plan. 106 (k)(g)âThe plan with respect to the information of the 107 state on energy availability and consumption. 108 (l)(h)âThe amount of renewable energy resources the utility 109 produces or purchases. 110 (m)(i)âThe amount of renewable energy resources the utility 111 plans to produce or purchase over the 10-year planning horizon 112 and the means by which the production or purchases will be 113 achieved. 114 (n)(j)âA statement describing how the production and 115 purchase of renewable energy resources impact the utilityâs 116 present and future capacity and energy needs. 117 (7)(3)âIn order to enable it to carry out its duties under 118 this section, the commission may, after hearing, establish an 119 administrative fee that may not a study fee which shall not 120 exceed $1,000 for each proposed plan studied. 121 (8)(4)âThe commission may adopt rules governing the method 122 of submitting, processing, and approving studying the 10-year 123 plans as required by this section, including the required 124 contents of such plans and procedures for intervention and 125 discovery in the plan review proceedings. 126 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.